Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.120

Accidental death and dismemberment coverage during aircraft flights for state officers, employees, and legislators.

The departments of state government are authorized to procure at state expense accidental death and dismemberment coverage not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars per person for the benefit of state employees and state elected officials, including legislators, while they are, in the course of their employment, passengers on or crewmembers of any nonscheduled aircraft flight.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 6 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 68 s 1.]